Massachusetts, session 194th, H3204.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 5 of Chapter 59 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2023 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by adding the following section:
Section 5P: In any city or town which accepts the provisions of this section, the board of
selectmen of a town or in a municipality having a town council form of government, the town
council or the mayor with the approval of the city council in a city may establish a tax exemption
or abatement program for persons who have a legal relationship as a grandparent raising a
grandchild and are over the age of 55. In exchange for raising a grandchild, the city or town shall
reduce the real property tax obligation of such person on his tax bills and any reduction so
provided shall be in addition to any exemption or abatement to which any such person is
otherwise entitled. Provided such reduction of the real property tax bill shall not exceed $1,000
of 2

per child in a given tax year. It shall be the responsibility of the city or town to maintain a record
for each taxpayer the total amount by which the real property tax has been reduced and to
provide a copy of such record to the assessor in order that the actual tax bill reflect the reduced
rate. A copy of such record shall also be provided to the taxpayer prior to the issuance of the
actual tax bill. Such cities and towns shall have the power to create local rules and procedures for
implementing this section in any way consistent with the intent of this section.
A city or town, by vote of its legislative body, subject to its charter, may adjust the
exemption in this clause by allowing the maximum reduction of the real property tax bill to be
based on a verified established legal relationship to the child(ren) in a given tax year.
of 2